Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2999
Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action may be maintained only by a person that is a member at the time the action is commenced and:

(1) That was a member when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

(2) Whose status as a member devolved upon the person by operation of law from a person that was a member at the time of the conduct.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 99.